apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="sobres/ortir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ortiríem</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiria</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiríeu</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiries</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortirien</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiria</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortirem</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiré</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortireu</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiràs</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiran</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortirà</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ortíssim</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ortís</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ortíssiu</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ortissis</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ortissin</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ortís</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortint</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortint</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ortírem</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ortí</l>      <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ortíreu</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ortires</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ortiren</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ortí</l>      <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortim</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortim</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiu</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiu</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>urtin</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>urten</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>urtin</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>urten</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>urti</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>urta</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>urti</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>urta</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortir</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortir</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortíem</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortia</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortíeu</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>orties</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortien</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortia</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ortíssim</l> <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ortírem</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ortís</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ortira</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ortíssiu</l> <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ortíreu</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ortissis</l> <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ortires</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ortissin</l> <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ortiren</l>  <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ortís</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ortira</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortides</l>   <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortida</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortits</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortit</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortim</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>urto</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>urt</l>      <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiu</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urts</l>      <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urten</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortim</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>urti</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>urta</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ortiu</l>     <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>urtis</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>urtes</l>    <r>ortir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="sortir" v="cat">  <i>s</i><par n="sobres/ortir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sortir d'un mal pas" v="cat"><i>s</i><par n="sobres/ortir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'un<b/>mal<b/>pas</l><r><g><b/>d'un<b/>mal<b/>pas</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sobresortir">     <i>sobres</i><par n="sobres/ortir__vblex"/></e>
